Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB726.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 711(b) and 712 of Title 65 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 711. Use of equipment during meetings.* * *(b) Rules of the Senate and House of Representatives.--[The] Except as provided under section 712(b) (relating to General Assembly meetings covered), the Senate and House of Representatives may adopt rules governing the recording or broadcast of their sessions and meetings and hearings of committees.§ 712. General Assembly meetings covered.(a) Meetings.--Notwithstanding any other provision, for the 123456789101112131415161718 purpose of this chapter, meetings of the General Assembly which are covered are as follows: all meetings of committees where bills are considered, all hearings where testimony is taken and all sessions of the Senate and the House of Representatives. Not included in the intent of this chapter are caucuses or meetings of any ethics committee created pursuant to the Rules of the Senate or the House of Representatives.(b) Recording and streaming.--The Senate and the House of Representatives shall record and post all meetings of committees and hearings covered under subsection (a) on the General Assembly's publicly accessible Internet website. When technically possible, the meetings of committees and hearings shall be available by live stream video.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0726PN0741 - 2 - 1234567891011121314